Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 6

Board of Directors and Officers

43-38-601. Powers.

All powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the cooperative shall be managed by or under the direction of the board of directors, subject to subsection (b) and any limitations set forth in the articles or bylaws agreement. A cooperative shall be board-managed, as designated in its articles. Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, each director shall have equal voting power per capita with each other director.

For convenience, one (1) or more officers, members or directors may be designated in the articles as persons authorized to execute instruments transferring real property held in the name of the cooperative and may set forth any limitations on this authority. This designation, however, in the absence of a clear statement that the named person or persons are the only person or persons authorized to execute instruments transferring real property, does not imply that other members, officers or directors do not have the authority to execute such instruments under § 43-38-602. A grant of authority contained in the current articles is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 24.

43-38-602. Agency of members in the cooperative.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, no member is an agent of the cooperative for the purpose of its business, other than a member designated by the board of directors, including the execution in the cooperative name of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business of the cooperative of which the person is a member, and a member does not bind the cooperative, unless the member so acting has in fact the authority to act for the cooperative in the particular matter.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, the following persons are agents of the cooperative and may legally bind the cooperative, subject to the limitation on these persons contained in this chapter:

The president;

A person designated in the articles or the bylaws as being so authorized; or

A person designated in writing by action of the directors as being so authorized.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 24.

43-38-603. Goverance of cooperative.

A cooperative shall be governed by its board of directors, which shall take all action for and on behalf of the cooperative, except those actions reserved or granted to members.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-604. Qualifications of directors.

The articles of organization or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a member of the cooperative, unless the articles of organization or bylaws so prescribe.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-605. Number of directors.

The board shall have not less than three (3) directors.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-606. Election of directors — Alternative voting.

Directors shall be elected for the term, at the time, and in the manner provided in this section and the bylaws. A majority of the directors shall be members and at least one (1) director shall be elected exclusively by the members holding patron membership interests. The voting authority of the directors shall be as prescribed in the bylaws; provided however, that at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the voting power on general matters of the cooperative shall be allocated to one (1) or more directors elected by members holding patron membership interests, or, in the alternative, one (1) or more directors elected by members holding patron membership interests shall have at least fifty-one percent (51%) voting power on general matters of the cooperative.

Directors shall be elected at the regular members' meeting for the terms of office prescribed in the bylaws. Except for directors elected at district meetings, all directors shall be elected at the regular members' meeting.

For a cooperative with districts or other units, members may elect directors on a district or unit basis, if provided in the bylaws. The directors may be nominated or elected at district meetings, if provided in the bylaws. Directors who are nominated at district meetings shall be elected at the annual regular members' meeting by vote of the entire membership, unless the bylaws provide that directors who are nominated at district meetings are to be elected by vote of the members of the district, at the district meeting or the annual regular members' meeting.

The following shall apply to alternative voting:

A member may not vote for a director other than by the member's presence at a meeting or by mail ballot authorized by the board of directors, unless alternative voting is authorized for election of directors by the articles or bylaws;

The ballot shall be in a form prescribed by the board;

The member shall mark the ballot for the candidate chosen and mail the ballot to the cooperative in a sealed plain envelope inside another envelope bearing the member's name, or shall vote in the alternative manner prescribed by the board; and

If the ballot of the member is received by the cooperative on or before the date of the regular members' meeting, the ballot shall be accepted and counted as the vote of the absent member.

If a member of a cooperative is not a natural person, and the bylaws do not provide otherwise, the member may appoint or elect one (1) or more natural persons to be eligible for election as a director to the board.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-607. Filling vacancies.

If a patron member director's position becomes vacant for a director who was elected by patron members, the board shall appoint a patron member of the cooperative to fill the director's position until the next regular or special members' meeting; provided however, that if there is only one (1) patron member director, a special members' meeting shall be called to fill the patron member director vacancy. If the vacating director was not a patron member, the board shall appoint a patron member or a patron member's representative to fill the vacant position. At the next regular or special members' meeting, the members or patron members shall elect a director to fill the unexpired term of the vacant director's position.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-608. Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, its chair or president, or to the corporation.

A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered, unless the notice specifies a later effective date.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-609. Removal of directors.

The members electing a director may remove the director at a members' meeting for cause related to the duties of the position of director and fill the vacancy caused by the removal.

If a director is elected exclusively by the members holding patron membership interests, only the patron members may participate in the vote to remove the director.

A director may be removed by the members or directors only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director, and the meeting notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of directors.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-610. Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-611. Limitation of director's liability.

A director's personal liability to the cooperative or members for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director may be eliminated or limited in the articles, except as provided in subsection (b).

The articles may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for:

A breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the cooperative or its members;

Acts or omissions that are not in good faith or involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

A transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit; or

An act or omission occurring before the date when the provision in the articles eliminating or limiting liability becomes effective.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-612. Meetings of the board of directors — Place — Electronic communication — Special meetings — Notice — Waiver of notice.

Meetings of the board of directors may be held from time to time as provided in the articles or bylaws at any place within or without the state that the board of directors may select or by any means described in subsection (b). If the board of directors fails to select a place for a meeting, the meeting must be held at the principal executive office, unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate by or conduct the meeting through the use of any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting and the minutes may reflect this.

A meeting held by electronic communication shall be deemed held at the location required by this section, articles or bylaws.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, the chief manager or the lesser of a majority of the directors or two (2) directors may call a special meeting of the board of directors by giving two (2) days' notice to all directors of the date, time and place of the meeting. The notice need not state the purpose of the meeting, unless this chapter, the articles or the bylaws require it.

If the day or date, time, and place of a board of directors' meeting have been provided in the articles or bylaws, or a regular meeting date, time and place have been established by the board of directors, no notice of the meeting is required. Notice of an adjourned meeting need not be other than by announcement at the meeting at which adjournment is taken; provided, that the period of adjournment does not exceed one (1) month for any one (1) adjournment.

A director may waive any notice required by this section, the articles or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2), the waiver must be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or other records of the cooperative.

A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting, unless the director at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon arrival, objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to any action taken at the meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-613. Quorum of the board.

Unless the articles or bylaws require a different number, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

A majority of the fixed number of directors, if the cooperative has a fixed board size; or

A majority of the number of directors prescribed under the articles or bylaws, or if no number is prescribed, the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if the cooperative has a variable-range board.

The articles or bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer than one third (1/3) of the fixed or prescribed number of directors determined under subsection (a).

If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors, unless the act, articles or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

If a quorum is present when a duly called or held meeting is convened, the directors present may continue to transact business until adjournment, even though the withdrawal of a number of directors originally present leaves less than the proportion or number otherwise required for a quorum.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when cooperative action is taken is deemed to have assented to the action taken unless:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting;

The director's dissent or abstention from the action taken is entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

The director delivers written notice of dissent or abstention to the presiding officer of the meeting before its adjournment or to the cooperative immediately after adjournment of the meeting. The right of dissent or abstention is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-614. Action without a meeting of the board of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, an action required or permitted to be taken at a board of directors' meeting may be taken without a meeting. If all directors consent to taking the action without a meeting, the affirmative vote for the number of directors that would be necessary to authorize or take the action at a meeting is the act of the board of directors. The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director in one (1) or more counterparts, indicating the signing director's vote or abstention on the action, and shall be included in the minutes or filed with the cooperative's records reflecting the action taken.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), the articles or bylaws may provide for written director action to be taken without all directors consenting to the waiver of actual meeting, but this consent must be of at least two thirds (2/3) of the directors.

The written action is effective when the last required director signs the action, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action.

If the articles or bylaws permit written action and waiver of meetings by less than all directors, all directors must be notified immediately of the action's text and effective date. Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action. A director who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions taken by this written action.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document. Any action requiring a meeting by the board of directors is satisfied by a consent signed under this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-615. Creation of committees.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may create one (1) or more committees. A committee may consist of one (1) member. All members of committees of the board of directors who exercise powers of the board of directors must be members of the board of directors and serve at the pleasure of the board of directors.

The creation of a committee and appointment of a member or members to it must be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the articles or bylaws to take action under § 43-38-613.

Sections 43-38-612 — 43-38-614, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles or bylaws, each committee may exercise the authority of the board of directors under § 43-38-603.

A committee may not:

Authorize distributions, except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees;

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws; or

Authorize or approve the issuance or sale or contract for sale of shares or determine the designation and relative rights, preferences, and limitation of a class or series of shares, except that the board of directors may authorize a committee, or senior executive officer of the cooperative, to do so within limits specifically prescribed by the board of directors.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in § 43-38-616.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-616. Standards for directors.

A director shall discharge the duties of the position as a director, including duties as a member of a committee, in good faith, in a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the cooperative, and with the care an ordinary prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

A director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the cooperative whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters that the director reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member, if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A director is not acting in good faith if the director has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subdivision (b)(1) unwarranted.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take action, if the director performed the duties of the office in compliance with subsections (a) and (b).

A director's personal liability to the cooperative or its members for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director may be eliminated or limited in the articles or bylaws; such provisions shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for the following:

For any breach of the director's duty or loyalty to the cooperative or its members; however, the articles or bylaws may define the duty loyalty in a manner to reflect the understanding of the parties; provided, that this definition is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

Under § 43-38-904; or

For any act or omission occurring before the date when the provision in the articles eliminating or limiting liability becomes effective.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the articles or bylaws may define the standard of conduct for directors in a manner to reflect the understanding of the parties; provided, that this definition is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances.

A person alleging a violation of this section has the burden of proving the violation.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-617. Conflict of interest.

A conflict of interest transaction is a transaction with the cooperative in which a director, officer or non-director member of a special litigation committee of the cooperative has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction is not voidable by the cooperative solely because of the director's or officer's interest in the transaction if any one (1) of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the director's or officer's interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors and the board of directors or committee authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction;

The material facts of the transaction and director's or officer's interest were disclosed or known to the members entitled to vote and they authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction;

The transaction was fair to the cooperative;

The transaction was of a nature in which the conflict of interest is waived by the articles or bylaws. The waiver shall be upheld unless manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances.

For purposes of this section, a director or officer of the cooperative has an indirect interest in a transaction, if, but not only if:

Another entity in which the director or officer has material financial indirect interest or in which the director or officer is a general partner is party to the transaction; or

Another entity of which the director or officer is a governor, director, manager, officer or trustee is a party to the transaction and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the cooperative.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(1), a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified, if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board of directors, or on the committee, who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction, but a transaction may not be authorized, approved, or ratified under this section by a single director. If a majority of the directors who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve, or ratify the transaction, a quorum must be present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of any action taken under subdivision (a)(1), if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved, or ratified as provided in subdivision (a)(1).

For purposes of subdivision (a)(2), a conflict of interest transaction is authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the vote of a majority of the membership interests entitled to be counted under this subsection (d). Membership interests owned by or voted under the control of a director or officer who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and membership interests owned by or voted under the control of an entity described in subdivision (b)(1), may not be counted in a vote of members to determine whether to authorize, approve or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under subdivision (a)(2). The vote of those membership interests, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other provisions of this chapter. A majority of the membership interests, whether or not present, that are entitled to be counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection (d) constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-618. Officers.

The cooperative shall have a president and a secretary who shall not be the same person, and such other officers as may be elected or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with § 43-38-619.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-619. Election or appointment of officers.

The board of directors shall elect or appoint, in a manner set forth in the articles or bylaws or in a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, a president, secretary and any other officers or agents the board of directors considers necessary or desirable for the operation and management of the cooperative. These officers and agents have the powers, rights, duties, responsibilities, and terms of office provided for in the articles or bylaws, or as determined by the board of directors.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-620. Residency requirements for officers.

Officers need not be residents of this state or members of the cooperative, unless the articles or bylaws so require. The articles or bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for officers.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-621. Standards for officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge all duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interest of the cooperative.

In discharging these duties, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the cooperative, or a subsidiary of the cooperative, whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matter presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence.

An officer is not acting in good faith if the officer has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

An officer is not liable for any action taken as an officer or any failure to take any action, if the officer performed the duties of office in compliance with this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.

43-38-622. Resignation or removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the cooperative. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered, unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made effective at a later date and the cooperative accepts the future effective date, the cooperative's board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date. The cooperative's board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date, if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date.

A board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause, and any officer or assistant officer, if appointed by another officer, may likewise be removed by that officer.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 25.